Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.541

Employees.

Park and recreation service areas may hire employees and may fund all or a portion of the salaries and benefits of county park employees who perform work on county park and recreation facilities within the service area and may fund all or a portion of the salaries and benefits of city or town park employees who perform work on city or town park and recreation facilities within the service area.

[ 1988 c 82 s 2; 1981 c 210 s 12.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 210: See note following RCW 36.68.400.